Florida, session 2026, HB605.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 112.3662, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
112.3662 Prohibiting political subdivision from using
public funds to fund certain entities and organizations.—
(1) As used in this section, the term:
(a) "Not-for-profit entity or organization" means a
Florida corporation, not for profit, incorporated under chapter
617, and approved by the Secretary of State.
(b) "Political subdivision" has the same meaning as in s.
112.3121.
(2) A political subdivision may not use public funds to
fund any not-for-profit entity or organization in this state.
(3) Subsection (2) does not apply to rural hospitals as
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb605-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 605 2026
defined in s. 395.602(2).
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb605-00